hu: Orsó formatényezője: Orsó stílusú spulni; Kúp; Csak mag (perem nélkül); Peremes spulni; King spool; Önzáró spulni; Osztott spulni / szorítós spulni; Egyenes oldalú spulni; Egyéb
fi: Kerän muototekijä: Puolan mallinen kela; Kartio; Vain hylsy (ei laippoja); Laippakela; King-kela; Itselukittuva kela; Jaettu kela / puristinkela; Suorasivuinen kela; Muu
tr: Makara form faktörü: Makara tipi bobin; Koni; Sadece gövde (flanşsız); Flanşlı bobin; Geniş tabanlı makara; Kendinden kilitlenen makara; Ayrılabilir makara / kelepçeli makara; Düz kenarlı makara; Diğer
pt-PT: Formato do carretel: Carreto tipo bobina; Cone; Apenas núcleo (sem flanges); Bobina com flanges; Bobina king; Bobina de bloqueio automático; Bobina bipartida/bobina de fixação; Bobina de lados retos; Outro
sv: Utformning av spole: Spolformad; Kon; Endast kärna (inga flänsar); Flänsad spole; King-spole; Självlåsande spole; Delad spole/klämspole; Spole med raka sidor; Övrigt
de: Spulenform: Bobinenspule; Konus; Nur Kern (ohne Flansche); Flanschspule; Kingspule; Selbstsichernde Spule; Geteilte Spule/Klemmspule; Spule mit geraden Seiten; Sonstige
pl: Forma szpuli: Szpula bębenkowa; Stożek; Tylko rdzeń (bez kołnierzy); Szpula z kołnierzami; Szpula stożkowa typu king; Szpula samoblokująca; Szpula dzielona / szpula zaciskowa; Szpula o prostych bokach; Inne
zh-CN: 线轴外形: 梭芯轴; 锥形轴; 仅卷芯（无挡板）; 带挡板线轴; 宝塔线轴; 自锁线轴; 分体式线轴/夹持线轴; 直边线轴; 其他
cs: Tvarový faktor cívky: Cívka ve stylu bubínku; Kužel; Pouze střed (bez přírub); Cívka s přírubou; Královská cívka (king spool); Samosvorná cívka; Dělená cívka / upínací cívka; Cívka s rovnými stranami; Jiné
ko: 스풀 폼 팩터: 보빈형 스풀; 콘; 코어 전용(플랜지 없음); 플랜지형 스풀; 킹 스풀; 셀프 락킹 스풀; 스플릿 스풀/클램프 스풀; 스트레이트 사이드 스풀; 기타
ja: スプールフォームファクター: ボビンスタイル; コーン; コアのみ (フランジなし); フランジ付きスプール; キングスプール; セルフロックスプール; 分割 / クランプスプール; ストレートサイドスプール; その他
en: Spool form factor: Bobbin-style spool; Cone; Core-only (no flanges); Flanged spool; King spool; Self-locking spool; Split spool / clamp spool; Straight-sided spool; Other
bg-BG: Форм фактор на шпулата: Макара тип калерче; Конус; Само сърцевина (без фланци); Макара с фланци; Макара King; Самозаключваща се макара; Разделена макара / макара със скоба; Макара с прави стени; Друго
vi: Định dạng của cuộn dây: Ống chỉ kiểu suốt; Côn; Chỉ lõi (không có mặt bích); Ống chỉ có mặt bích; Ống chỉ lớn; Ống chỉ tự khóa; Ống chỉ chia / ống chỉ kẹp; Ống chỉ cạnh thẳng; Khác
nl: Spoel vormfactor: Spoel in klosvorm; Kegel; Alleen kern (zonder flenzen); Spoel met flens; Kingspoel; Zelfborgende spoel; Gedeelde spoel / klemspoel; Rechte spoel; Overige
th: รูปทรงของแกนม้วนด้าย: หลอดด้ายแบบกระสวย; ทรงกรวย; เฉพาะแกน (ไม่มีปีก); หลอดด้ายแบบมีปีก; คิงสปูล; หลอดด้ายแบบล็อกในตัว; หลอดด้ายแบบแยกส่วน / หลอดด้ายแบบหนีบ; หลอดด้ายด้านข้างตรง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik kalema: Špula u obliku kalema; Konus; Samo jezgra (bez prirubnica); Špula s prirubnicom; King špula; Samozaključavajuća špula; Dvodijelna špula / stezna špula; Špula s ravnim stranicama; Ostalo
ru: Формфактор шпули: В виде шпульки; Конус; Только сердечник (без фланцев); Катушка с фланцами; Большая катушка (King spool); Самоблокирующаяся катушка; Разъемная катушка / катушка с зажимом; Катушка с прямыми стенками; Другое
sk-SK: Tvarový faktor cievky: Špulková cievka; Kužeľ; Iba jadro (bez prírub); Prírubová cievka; Kráľovská cievka; Samosvorná cievka; Delená cievka/upínacia cievka; Cievka s rovnými stranami; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika tuljave: Tuljava; Stožec; Samo jedro (brez obročev); Tuljava z obroči; King tuljava; Samozaporna tuljava; Deljena tuljava / vpenjalna tuljava; Tuljava z ravnimi stranicami; Drugo
fr: Format de la bobine: Bobine classique; Cône; Mandrin seul (sans rebords); Bobine à rebords; Bobine King; Bobine autobloquante; Bobine séparable / bobine à serrage; Bobine à bords droits; Autre
it: Fattore di forma della bobina: Rocchetto a bobina; Cono; Solo anima (senza flange); Rocchetto flangiato; Rocchetto king; Rocchetto autobloccante; Rocchetto diviso / rocchetto a morsetto; Rocchetto a lati dritti; Altro
pt-BR: Formato da bobina: Carretel tipo bobina; Cone; Apenas núcleo (sem flanges); Carretel com flange; Carretel king; Carretel com travamento automático; Carretel bipartido/carretel de fixação; Carretel de laterais retas; Outro
ro-RO: Factor de formă al rolei: Mosor tip bobină; Con; Doar miez (fără flanșe); Mosor cu flanșe; Mosor King; Mosor cu autoblocare; Mosor despicat / mosor cu clemă; Mosor cu laturi drepte; Altele
da: Spoleformfaktor: Spole (bobbin); Kegle; Kun kerne (uden flanger); Spole med flange; King-spole; Selvlåsende spole; Delt spole/klemmespole; Ligesidet spole; Andet
nb: Formfaktor for spole: Spole i snelleform; Kjegle; Kun kjerne (uten flens); Spole med flens; King-spole; Selvlåsende spole; Delt spole / klemmespole; Spole med rette sider; Annet
el: Παράγοντας μορφής καρουλιού: Καρούλι τύπου μασουριού; Κώνος; Μόνο πυρήνας (χωρίς φλάντζες); Καρούλι με φλάντζα; King spool; Αυτοασφαλιζόμενο καρούλι; Διαιρούμενο καρούλι / καρούλι με σφιγκτήρα; Καρούλι με ίσιες πλευρές; Άλλο
lt-LT: Ritės formos tipas: Ritės formos špūlė; Kūgis; Tik šerdis (be briaunų); Špūlė su briaunomis; „King“ špūlė; Savaime užsifiksuojanti špūlė; Skelta špūlė / prispaudžiama špūlė; Tiesių kraštų špūlė; Kita
zh-TW: 線軸外型規格: 梭芯型線軸; 錐形線管; 僅有捲芯 (無凸緣); 凸緣線軸; 寶塔線管; 自鎖線軸; 分離式線軸/夾式線軸; 直邊線軸; 其他
es: Foctor de forma del carrete: Carrete tipo bobina; Cono; Solo núcleo (sin bridas); Carrete con bridas; Carrete king; Carrete autobloqueante; Carrete dividido/carrete de abrazadera; Carrete de lados rectos; Otro